ja: 接眼レンズ/アダプター材質: アルミニウム; ガラス; 金属; ナイロン; プラスチック; ゴム; シリコーン; スチール; その他
ro-RO: Material ocular/adaptor: Aluminiu; Sticlă; Metal; Nailon; Plastic; Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel; Altele
sl-SI: Material okularja/adapterja: Aluminij; Steklo; Kovina; Najlon; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Jeklo; Drugo
pt-BR: Material de óculo/adaptador: Alumínio; Vidro; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Aço; Outro
ko: 접안렌즈/어댑터 자재: 알루미늄; 유리; 금속; 나일론; 플라스틱; 고무; 실리콘; 강철; 기타
zh-CN: 显微镜目镜/转接器的材质: 铝; 玻璃; 金属; 尼龙; 塑料; 橡胶; 硅胶; 钢; 其他
it: Materiale dell'oculare/adattatore: Alluminio; Vetro; Metallo; Nylon; Plastica; Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio; Altro
el: Υλικό προσοφθαλμίου/προσαρμογέα: Αλουμίνιο; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Χάλυβας; Άλλο
hu: Szemlencse/Adapter anyaga: Alumínium; Üveg; Fém; Nejlon; Műanyag; Gumi; Szilikon; Acél; Egyéb
tr: Mercek/Adaptör malzemesi: Alüminyum; Cam; Metal; Plastik; Plastik; Kauçuk; Silikon; Çelik; Diğer
cs: Materiál okuláru/adaptéru: Hliník; Sklo; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Guma; Silikon; Ocel; Jiné
sv: Okular/adapter - material: Aluminium; Glas; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Stål; Övrigt
ru: Материал окуляра или адаптера: Алюминий; Стеклянные; Металл; Нейлон; Пластик; Резина; Силикон; Сталь; Другой
zh-TW: 目鏡/轉接器材質: 鋁; 玻璃; 金屬; 尼龍; 塑膠; 橡膠; 矽膠; 鋼; 其他
pl: Materiał adaptera do okularów: Aluminium; Szkło; Metal; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Silikon; Stal; Inne
de: Okular-/Adaptermaterial: Aluminium; Glas; Metall; Nylon; Kunststoff; Gummi; Silikon; Stahl; Sonstiges
da: Okular-/adaptermateriale: Aluminum; Glas; Metal; Nylon; Plast; Gummi; Silikone; Stål; Andet
fr: Matériau de l’oculaire/adaptateur: Aluminum; Verre; Métal; Nylon; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier; Autre
fi: Okulaarin/sovittimen materiaali: Alumiini; Lasi; Metalli; Nailon; Muovi; Kumi; Silikoni; Teräs; Muu
vi: Vật liệu thị kính/bộ chuyển đổi: Nhôm; Thủy tinh; Kim loại; Nylon; Nhựa; Cao su; Silicon; Thép; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál okuláru/adaptéra: Hliník; Sklo; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Guma; Silikón; Oceľ; Iné
nl: Materiaal oculair/adapter: Aluminium; Glas; Metaal; Nylon; Plastic; Rubber; Siliconen; Staal; Andere
pt-PT: Material do adaptador/óculos: Alumínio; Vidro; Metal; Náilon; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Aço; Outro
bg-BG: Материал на окуляр/адаптер: Алуминий; Стъкло; Метал; Найлон; Пластмаса; Каучук; Силикон; Стомана; Други
lt-LT: Okuliaro / adapterio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Stiklas; Metalas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Plienas; Kita
nb: Okular-/adaptermateriale: Aluminium; Glass; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Stål; Annet
hr-HR: Materijal okulara/adaptera: Aluminij; Staklo; Metal; Najlon; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Čelik; Ostalo
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำอะแดปเตอร์ช่องมองภาพ: อะลูมิเนียม; แก้ว; โลหะ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
en: Eyepiece/Adapter material: Aluminum; Glass; Metal; Nylon; Plastic; Rubber; Silicone; Steel; Other
es: Material de los adaptadores oculares: Aluminio; Vidrio; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Goma; Silicona; Acero; Otros